Utah statutes.
70A-9a-210.   Request for accounting -- Request regarding list of collateral
or statement of account.
(1)  In this section:
(a)  "Request" means a record of a type described in Subsection (1)(b), (c),
or (d).
(b)  "Request for an accounting" means a record authenticated by a debtor
requesting that the recipient provide an accounting of the unpaid obligations
secured by collateral and reasonably identifying the transaction or
relationship that is the subject of the request.
(c)  "Request regarding a list of collateral" means a record authenticated by
a debtor requesting that the recipient approve or correct a list of what the
debtor believes to be the collateral securing an obligation and reasonably
identifying the transaction or relationship that is the subject of the
request.
(d)  "Request regarding a statement of account" means a record authenticated
by a debtor requesting that the recipient approve or correct a statement
indicating what the debtor believes to be the aggregate amount of unpaid
obligations secured by collateral as of a specified date and reasonably
identifying the transaction or relationship that is the subject of the
request.
(2)  Subject to Subsections (3), (4), (5), and (6), a secured party, other
than a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory
notes or a consignor, shall comply with a request within 14 days after
receipt:
(a)  in the case of a request for an accounting, by authenticating and sending
to the debtor an accounting; and
(b)  in the case of a request regarding a list of collateral or a request
regarding a statement of account, by authenticating and sending to the debtor
an approval or correction.
(3)  A secured party that claims a security interest in all of a particular
type of collateral owned by the debtor may comply with a request regarding a
list of collateral by sending to the debtor an authenticated record including
a statement to that effect within 14 days after receipt.
(4)  A person that receives a request regarding a list of collateral, claims
no interest in the collateral when it receives the request, and claimed an
interest in the collateral at an earlier time shall comply with the request
within 14 days after receipt by sending to the debtor an authenticated record:
(a)  disclaiming any interest in the collateral; and
(b)  if known to the recipient, providing the name and mailing address of any
assignee of or successor to the recipient's interest in the collateral.
(5) A person that receives a request for an accounting or a request regarding
a statement of account, claims no interest in the obligations when it receives
the request, and claimed an interest in the obligations at an earlier time
shall comply with the request within 14 days after receipt by sending to the
debtor an authenticated record:
(a)  disclaiming any interest in the obligations; and
(b)  if known to the recipient, providing the name and mailing address of any
assignee of or successor to the recipient's interest in the obligations.
(6)  A debtor is entitled without charge to one response to a request under
this section during any six-month period.  The secured party may require
payment of a charge not exceeding $25 for each additional response.
